Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.100

Proposed operating budgets—Reports to legislature.

The commission shall prepare and present to the legislature proposed operating budgets for the commission in accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW. The commission shall report to the legislature in the manner required by law, with due regard for the confidentiality of proceedings before the commission.

[ 1981 c 268 s 11.]